Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.810

The Evergreen State College—Established.

There is hereby established in Thurston county a state college, The Evergreen State College.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.810. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 2. Formerly RCW 28.81.610.]

NOTES:

Legislative declaration of purpose: See 1967 c 47 s 1.

Site selection and initial procedure to prepare college for reception of students: See 1967 c 47 s 4.